Montana, session 2025, SB89.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Sexual and violent offender presentence investigation and reporting
unit -- duties. (1) There is a sexual and violent offender presentence investigation and reporting unit in the
department of corrections. The unit consists of probation and parole officers assigned by the department.
(2) In addition to other duties assigned to it by the department director or otherwise required by
law, the unit shall make a presentence investigation and report as directed by the court in accordance with 46-
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 89

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 89.1
18-111 upon the acceptance of a plea or upon a verdict or finding of guilty to:
(a) a sexual offense as defined in 46-23-502; or
(b) a violent offense as defined in 46-23-502.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "probation and parole officers" has the meaning provided in
46-18-111.

Section 2. Section 46-18-111, MCA, is amended to read:
"46-18-111. Presentence investigation -- when required -- definition. (1) (a) (i) Upon the
acceptance of a plea or upon a verdict or finding of guilty to one or more felony offenses, except as provided in
subsection (1)(d), the district court may request and direct the probation and parole officer to make a
presentence investigation and report unless an investigation and report has been provided to the court prior to
the plea or the verdict or finding of guilty.
(ii) Unless additional information is required under subsection (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(d), or (1)(e) or
unless more time is required to allow for victim input, a preliminary or final presentence investigation and report,
if requested, must be available to the court within 30 business days of the plea or the verdict or finding of guilty.
(iii) If a presentence investigation report has been requested, the district court shall consider the
presentence investigation report prior to sentencing.
(b) (i) If the defendant was convicted of an offense under 45-5-502, 45-5-503, 45-5-504, 45-5-507,
45-5-508, 45-5-601(3), 45-5-625, 45-5-627, 45-5-705, 45-5-706, 45-5-711, or 45-8-218 or if the defendant was
convicted under 46-23-507 and the offender was convicted of failure to register as a sexual offender pursuant
to Title 46, chapter 23, part 5, the court shall order a psychosexual evaluation of the defendant unless the
defendant is sentenced under 46-18-219. The evaluation must include:
(A) a recommendation as to treatment of the defendant in the least restrictive environment,
considering the risk the defendant presents to the community and the defendant's needs;
(B) an identification of the level of risk the defendant presents to the community using the
standards established in 37-1-139; and
(C) the defendant's needs.
(ii) Unless a psychosexual evaluation has been provided to the court prior to the plea or the verdict
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 89

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 89.1
or finding of guilty, the evaluation must be completed by a sexual offender evaluator selected by the court and
who has a license endorsement as provided for in 37-1-139. The psychosexual evaluation must be made
available to the county attorney's office, the defense attorney, the probation and parole officer, and the
sentencing judge.
(iii) All costs related to the evaluation, including an evaluation ordered by the court as allowed in
subsection (1)(b)(ii), must be paid by the defendant. If the defendant is determined by the district court to be
indigent, all costs related to the evaluation, including an evaluation ordered by the court as allowed in
subsection (1)(b)(ii), are the responsibility of the district court and must be paid by the county or the state, or
both, under Title 3, chapter 5, part 9. The district court may order subsequent psychosexual evaluations at the
request of the county attorney. The requestor of any subsequent psychosexual evaluations is responsible for
the cost of the evaluation.
(c) (i) If the defendant was convicted of an offense under 45-5-212(2)(b) or (2)(c), the investigation
may include a mental health evaluation of the defendant and a recommendation as to treatment of the
defendant in the least restrictive environment, considering the risk the defendant presents to the community
and the defendant's needs.
(ii) The evaluation must be completed by a qualified psychiatrist, licensed clinical psychologist,
advanced practice registered nurse, licensed clinical social worker, licensed clinical professional counselor,
licensed marriage and family therapist, or other professional with comparable credentials acceptable to the
department of labor and industry. The mental health evaluation must be made available to the county attorney's
office, the defense attorney, the probation and parole officer, and the sentencing judge.
(iii) All costs related to the evaluation must be paid by the defendant. If the defendant is
determined by the district court to be indigent, all costs related to the evaluation are the responsibility of the
district court and must be paid by the county or the state, or both, under Title 3, chapter 5, part 9.
(d) If the defendant is convicted of a violent offense, as defined in 46-23-502, or if the defendant is
convicted of a crime for which a victim or entity may be entitled to restitution, and the amount of restitution is not
contained in a plea agreement, the court shall order a presentence investigation.
(e) When, pursuant to 46-14-311, the court has ordered a presentence investigation and a report
pursuant to this section, the mental evaluation must be attached to the presentence investigation report and
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 89

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 89.1
becomes part of the report. The report must be made available to persons and entities as provided in 46-18-
113.
(2) The district court may order a presentence investigation for a defendant convicted of a
misdemeanor only if the defendant was convicted of a misdemeanor that the state originally charged as a
sexual or violent offense as defined in 46-23-502.
(3) The defendant shall pay to the department of corrections a $50 fee at the time that the report is
completed, unless the court determines that the defendant is not able to pay the fee within a reasonable time.
The fee may be retained by the department and used to finance contracts entered into under 53-1-203(5).
(4) For the purposes of 46-18-112, 46-18-113, and this section, "probation and parole officer"
means:
(a) a probation and parole officer who is employed by the department of corrections pursuant to
46-23-1002; or
(b) an employee of the department of corrections who has received specific training or who
possesses specific expertise to make a presentence investigation and report but who is not required to be
licensed as a probation and parole officer by the public safety officer standards and training council created in
2-15-2029."

Section 3. Section 46-18-242, MCA, is amended to read:
"46-18-242. Investigation and report of victim's loss. (1) Whenever the court believes that a victim
may have sustained a pecuniary loss or whenever the prosecuting attorney requests, the court shall order the
probation and parole officer as defined in 46-18-111, the restitution officer, or other another designated person
to include in the presentence investigation and report if requested pursuant to 46-18-111:
(a) a list of the offender's assets; and
(b) an affidavit that specifically describes the victim's pecuniary loss and the replacement value in
dollars of the loss, submitted by the victim.
(2) When a presentence report is not requested, the court shall accept evidence of the victim's loss
at the time of sentencing."

- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 89

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 89.1
NEW SECTION. Section 4. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 53, chapter 1, part 2, and the provisions of Title 53, chapter 1, part 2, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 89